Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 1. Utility Consumer Services Cooperatives Act.
§ 56-231.35.
Charter fees, etc.

The general laws relating to fees and other charges in connection with issuing charters, amendments thereto and dissolutions of corporations organized on a mutual basis or without capital stock shall apply to cooperatives organized under the provisions
of this article.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.36.
Construction of article; conflicting laws.

This article is to be liberally construed and the enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods or things, and any provisions of other laws
in conflict with the provisions of this article shall not apply to cooperatives operating hereunder. Any object, purpose, power, manner, method or thing which is not specifically prohibited is permitted.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.37.
How article cited.

This article may be cited as the “Utility Consumer Services Cooperatives Act.”

History.
1999, c. 874.